Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, out of the General
Fund, the amount of  $75,000,000 for the purposes for which the Emergency Board lawfully
may allocate funds.
SECTION 2. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $200,000,000, to be allocated to state agencies  for state employee com-
pensation changes for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2020, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 3. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $20,000,000, to be allocated  to state agencies for compensation changes
driven by collective bargaining for workers who are not state employees.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2020, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 4. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $20,000,000, to be allocated to the Public Defense Services Commission
for caseload activities, including activities designed  to improve indigent defense caseloads
and to implement an improved public defense contract model.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2020, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 5.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5510), for the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, for the Wildlife Di-
vision, is increased by $200,000 for the predator control program.
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 1
SECTION 6. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Department of Agriculture by section 1  (3), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5002), for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, for natural
resources, is increased by $100,000 to conduct water quality monitoring of Klamath Lake.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the State Department of Agriculture by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (En-
rolled House Bill 5002), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, for food safety, is increased
by $200,000 for the predator control program.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the State Department of Agriculture by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (En-
rolled House Bill 5002), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, for food safety, is increased
by $600,000 for lab equipment replacement.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the State Department of Agriculture by section 1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (En-
rolled House Bill 5002), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, for natural resources, is in-
creased by $300,000 for the Invasive Species Council.
SECTION 7.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by  section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 5515), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for the Crime Victim and Survivor
Services Division, is increased by $700,000 for the Oregon Crime Victims Law Center.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Columbia River Gorge Commission by section 1,  chapter 217, Oregon Laws 2019
(Enrolled House Bill 5009), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019,  is increased by $109,813
for joint operating expenses.
SECTION 9. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Corrections by section 1 (4), chapter 573, Oregon Laws 2017,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, for community corrections, is decreased by $150,000.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Department of Corrections by section 1 (6), chapter 573, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for capital improvements, is increased by $150,000.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Department of Corrections by section 1 (3), chapter 573, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for offender management and rehabilitation, is decreased  by
$500,000.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Department  of Corrections by section 1 (1), chapter 573, Oregon Laws 2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for operations and health services, is increased by  $1,000,000.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Department  of Corrections by section 1 (2), chapter 573, Oregon Laws 2017, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2019, for central administration and  administrative services, is in-
creased by $2,500,000.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3, chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5533), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds collected or received by the Department of  Public Safety Standards and
Training, is increased by $325,955 for the purchase of a fire truck.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5506), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Criminal  Justice Commission,
is increased by $275,086 for jail data analysis.
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 2
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  by section 1, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5506), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, is  increased by
$78,242 for taking reports on police profiling.
SECTION 13. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by  section 1 (9), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2019 (Enrolled House  Bill 5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for public
university statewide programs, is decreased by $276,581 for the transfer of  the Criminal
Justice Policy Research Institute’s Law Enforcement Contacts  Policy and Data Review
Committee responsibilities from Portland  State University to the Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission.
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5504), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Department of Corrections, for central
administration and administrative services, is increased by $724,932  for the cost of bond is-
suance.
SECTION 15. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5504), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for debt service,  is in-
creased by $1,579,588.
SECTION 16. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Corrections, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,650,000 for the Corrections Information System Tool Upgrade
project.
SECTION 17.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $51,378
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Department of Cor-
rections, for debt service.
SECTION 18.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $95,000
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Oregon Youth Authority,
for debt service.
SECTION 19.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill
5031), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements
from federal service agreements, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described
in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5031), collected or received
by the Oregon Military Department, for operations, is increased by $348,000 for  the cost of
bond issuance.
SECTION 20. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Military Department  by section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019
(Enrolled House Bill 5031), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for debt  service, is in-
creased by $533,528.
SECTION 21. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter 427, Oregon  Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5541), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 3
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Youth Authority, is increased
by $774,709 for the cost of bond issuance.
SECTION 22. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Youth  Authority by section 1 (5), chapter 427, Oregon Laws 2019 (En-
rolled Senate Bill 5541), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for  debt service, is increased
by $914,307.
SECTION 23. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the  amount estab-
lished by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019  (Enrolled Senate Bill 5519), for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds, collected  or received by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission, for adminis-
trative expenses, is increased by $233,400 for an internal auditor position.
SECTION 24. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5512), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
for operations, from fees, moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and
federal funds from  the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for
contract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in section 2,
chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5512), collected or received by the
Housing and Community Services  Department, is increased by $376,763 for management of
agency research and procurement responsibilities.
SECTION 25. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5512), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
for operations, from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and
federal funds from the United States Department of Housing and Urban  Development for
contract services, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2,
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5512), collected or received  by the
Housing and Community Services Department, is increased  by $730,000 for the cost of issuing
bonds for the development of permanent supportive housing.
SECTION 26. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$2,932,331 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and federal funds from the United States Department  of Housing and Urban Development for
contract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  this section,
collected or received by the  Housing and Community Services Department, for payment of
expenses related to rental assistance  payments for permanent supportive housing developed
with proceeds from  bonds issued under the authority of Article XI-Q of the Oregon Consti-
tution.
SECTION 27.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Housing and Community Services  Department by section 5, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5512), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, is increased
by $11,370,998 for debt service.
SECTION 28. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5512), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
for operations, from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and
federal funds from the United States Department of Housing and Urban  Development for
contract services, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2,
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5512), collected or received  by the
Housing and Community Services Department, is increased by $1,550,000 for the cost of is-
suing bonds for the development of affordable housing for low income households issued un-
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 4
der the authority of Article XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution  for the Local Innovation and
Fast Track Housing Program.
SECTION 29. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5512), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
for operations, from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and
federal funds from the United States Department of Housing and Urban  Development for
contract services, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2,
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5512), collected or received  by the
Housing and  Community Services Department, is increased by $462,839 for payment of ex-
penses related to the development of  affordable housing for low income households funded
with proceeds from  bonds issued under the authority of Article XI-Q of the Oregon Consti-
tution for the Local Innovation and Fast Track Housing Program.
SECTION 30. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5512), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
for operations, from fees, moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and
federal funds from  the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for
contract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in section 2,
chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5512), collected or received by the
Housing and Community Services  Department, is increased by $15,278,750 for the purposes
of seeding a revolving loan program within the Housing and Community Services Department
to acquire market rate naturally occurring affordable housing, and the cost of issuance.
SECTION 31. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5512), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
for operations, from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and
federal funds from the United States Department of Housing and Urban  Development for
contract services, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2,
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5512), collected or received  by the
Housing and Community Services Department, is  increased by $25,407,658 for preservation
of manufactured dwelling parks, affordable housing properties with rental assistance  con-
tracts, properties undergoing significant recapitalization, publicly supported housing, and the
cost of issuance.
SECTION 32. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5524), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Economic Development
Fund to the Oregon  Business Development Department, for operations, is increased by
$175,350 for the establishment of an internal auditor position.
SECTION 33. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5524), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development  Depart-
ment, for operations, is increased by $30,944 for the  establishment of an internal auditor
position.
SECTION 34. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$157,290 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses for debt service from fees, moneys  or other revenues, including Mis-
cellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or  received by
the Oregon Business Development Department.
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 5
SECTION 35. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $10,000,000 for deposit into the University
Innovation Research Fund established by section 21,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled
House Bill 2377).
SECTION 36. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$10,000,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business
Development Department from the University Innovation Research Fund established  by
section 21, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 2377).
SECTION 37. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of $1  is
established for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Devel-
opment Fund to the Oregon Business Development Department for a tide gate and culvert
repair and replacement grant and loan program.
SECTION 38.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5524), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Economic Development
Fund to the Oregon Business Development Department, for infrastructure, is  increased by
the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) City of Sandy for Wastewater
System Project Planning and
Permitting................................. $ 500,000
(2) Columbia Corridor Drainage
Districts Joint Contracting
Authority for Levee Ready
Columbia................................... $ 500,000
(3) Port of Port Orford for
Redevelopment of Port of
Port Orford Cannery ................. $ 1,600,000
(4) City of Astoria for
Warehouse Site Cleanup and
Redevelopment.......................... $ 1,000,000
SECTION 39.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic  De-
velopment Fund to the Oregon Business Development Department, for  Arts and Cultural
Trust, for the following grants:
(1) Cottage Theatre, ACT III
Theatre Expansion .................... $ 375,000
(2) High Desert Museum, By Hand
Through Memory Exhibit
Renovation and Art of the
American West Gallery ............ $ 250,000
(3) Liberty Theatre, Stage House
and Facilities Improvements .... $ 1,000,000 
(4) Oregon Nikkei Endowment,
Oregon Nikkei Legacy Center
Renovations............................... $ 500,000
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 6
SECTION 40. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5524), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development  Depart-
ment, for infrastructure, is increased by $120,000,000  for the seismic rehabilitation grant
program.
SECTION 41. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Business Development  Department by section 1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5524), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for debt ser-
vice, is increased by $4,535,118.
SECTION 42.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5524), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment, for  infrastructure, is increased by $68,380,000 for programs and projects financed
through the issuance of lottery bonds.
SECTION 43. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5524), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment, for infrastructure, is  increased by $3,259,356 for the costs of issuing general obligation
and lottery bonds.
SECTION 44. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5524), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development  Depart-
ment, for Arts and Cultural Trust, is increased by $3,000,000 for  projects financed through
the issuance of lottery bonds.
SECTION 45. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5524), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development  Depart-
ment, for Arts and Cultural Trust, is increased by $78,938  for the cost of issuing lottery
bonds.
SECTION 46. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5524), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Economic Development
Fund to the Oregon Business Development Department, for business, innovation  and trade,
is increased by $5,000,000 for the Oregon Manufacturing Innovation Center.
SECTION 47. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section  1 (11), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled  House Bill 5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for the
Oregon State University Extension Service, is increased by $2,000,000 for fire  resilience and
resistance.
SECTION 48. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by  section 1 (9), chapter ___, Oregon
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 7
Laws 2019 (Enrolled House  Bill 5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for public
university statewide programs, is increased by $450,000  for the Oregon Institute of Technol-
ogy to support OMIC Rapid Toolmaking Center of Excellence research.
SECTION 49. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by  section 1 (9), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2019 (Enrolled House  Bill 5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for public
university statewide programs, is increased by $300,000  for the Oregon Institute of Technol-
ogy to develop additive manufacturing and prototyping training capability.
SECTION 50. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher  Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (16)(e), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for debt
service on outstanding general obligation bonds sold pursuant to Article XI-Q of the  Oregon
Constitution for the benefit of Oregon public universities, is increased by $955,149.
SECTION 51. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 6 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled  House Bill
5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds and funds described in  sections 8 to 12, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5024), collected or received by the Higher  Education Coordinating
Commission, for operations, is increased by $2,194,431 for the costs of issuing  general obli-
gation and lottery bonds.
SECTION 52. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$136,695,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department  from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
struction and Improvement Fund  for the project costs of, and cost of issuing general obli-
gation bonds for, county courthouse projects.
SECTION 53. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,300,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses for debt service  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Mis-
cellaneous Receipts, and including reimbursements from federal service agreements, but ex-
cluding lottery funds  and federal funds not described in this section, collected or received
by the Judicial Department.
SECTION 54.
In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $2,000,000  for planning associated with the replacement of the
Benton County Courthouse.
SECTION 55. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 303, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5532), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Public Defense Services Commission,
for the Contract and Business Services Division, is increased by $305,853 to restore  one po-
sition for the Application Contribution Program.
SECTION 56.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appro-
priation made to the Legislative Administration Committee by section 1 (1), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5517), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for
general program,  is increased by $1,361,800 for costs related to planning for Phase II of the
Capitol Accessibility, Maintenance and Safety Project.
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to  the
Legislative Administration Committee, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $766,117 for payment  of expenses of the Legislative Adminis-
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 8
tration Committee for  debt service for the Document Publishing and Management System
project.
(3) Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the amount of $5,168,000 is es-
tablished for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of ex-
penses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding
lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Legislative Administration
Committee, for the cost of issuing general obligation bonds and project costs  for the Docu-
ment Publishing and Management System project.
SECTION 57. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Office of the Governor, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $250,000 for the purpose of providing  administrative support to
the Governor’s Council on Wildfire Response.
SECTION 58. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys  allocated from the Veterans’ Services Fund es-
tablished under ORS 406.140 to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs for a grant to the Family
YMCA of Marion and Polk Counties to construct veterans’ affordable housing in Salem.
SECTION 59. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$4,056,603 is established for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Department of Veterans’ Affairs for projects financed  through
the issuance of lottery bonds and associated costs of issuance.
SECTION 60.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled  House Bill
5039), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
received as reimbursement  from the United States Department of Transportation, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5039), collected or received by the Department  of Transportation,
for the operations program, is increased by $42,876  for the Sherwood Pedestrian Connectors
project cost and cost of issuing lottery bonds.
SECTION 61. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (13),  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill
5039), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal  funds
received as reimbursement from the United States Department of Transportation,  but ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5039), collected or received by the Department of Transportation,
for rail, is increased by $5,106,587 for the Oregon International Port of Coos Bay Rail Line
Repairs and Bridge Replacement project cost and cost of issuing lottery bonds.
SECTION 62.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (8), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled  House Bill
5039), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
received as reimbursement  from the United States Department of Transportation, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5039), collected or received by the Department  of Transportation,
for the local government program, is increased  by $1,000,000 for a one-time contribution to
support the Neskowin Emergency Egress project in Tillamook County.
SECTION 63. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill
5039), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 9
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal  funds
received as reimbursement from the United States Department of Transportation,  but ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5039), collected or received by the Department  of Transportation,
for special programs, is increased by $650,000  to support the upgrade and recapitalization of
44 electric vehicle charging station locations known as the West Coast Electric Highway.
SECTION 64. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (9), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill
5039), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal  funds
received as reimbursement from the United States Department of Transportation,  but ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5039), collected or received by the Department of Transportation,
for driver and motor vehicle services, is increased by $221,442  for implementation of chapter
___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 2015).
NOTE: Section 65 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 66. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Education by section 1, chapter 218, Oregon  Laws 2019 (Enrolled
House Bill 5016), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for the State School Fund, is in-
creased by $5,101,078.
SECTION 67. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2,  chapter 218, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5016),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  from
lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund  to
the Department of Education for the State School Fund is decreased by $5,573,050.
SECTION 68. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3,  chapter 218, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5016),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses by
the Department of Education  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous
Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, federal funds  and funds described in section 4, chapter
218, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5016), collected  or received by the Department
of Education for the State School Fund, is increased by $471,972.
SECTION 69. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$125,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and proceeds of bonds  issued pursuant to Article XI-P of the Oregon Constitution, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of  Educa-
tion, for matching grants made to  school districts for construction or improvement to school
facilities through the Oregon School Capital Improvement Matching program.
SECTION 70.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 6 (2), chapter __, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House  Bill
5015), for the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, as the maximum limit for payment of ex-
penses, other than expenses described in sections 7 and 10, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2019
(Enrolled House  Bill 5015), from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous
Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Depart-
ment of Education, for operations, is increased by $1,090,000 for costs of issuance of general
obligation bonds.
SECTION 71.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 6 (1), chapter __, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House  Bill
5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds and funds described in sections  8 to 12, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 10
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5024), collected or received by the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission, for  operations, is increased by $4,184,935 for the statewide longitudinal data
system.
SECTION 72. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $975,000 for a grant to Treasure Valley
Community College for the Career and Technical Center.
SECTION 73.
 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5017), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for air quality,  is
increased by $250,000 for a smoke mitigation grant program.
SECTION 74. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (2), chapter 303, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5532),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for professional
services, is increased  by $3,500,000 to extend the Parent Child Representation Program into
Multnomah County.
SECTION 75. (1) In addition to and not in lieu  of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $3,000,000,  to be allocated for the implementation of grand jury
recording and chapter 650, Oregon Laws 2017.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2020, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 76. (1) In addition to and not in lieu  of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the  amount of $5,700,000 to be allocated to the Oregon Health Authority for
the support of  interdisciplinary assessment teams consistent with the requirements of
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 1).
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2020, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 77. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (5), chapter 302, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5527), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from lottery moneys allocated from the Parks and Natural Resources Fund to the State
Parks and Recreation Department, for community support and grants,  is increased by
$448,769 for the purpose of distributing grant funding for local parks.
SECTION 78.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $33,023
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the State Parks and Recre-
ation Department, for the payment of debt service.
SECTION 79.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (5), chapter 302, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5527), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the State Parks and Recreation Department,
for community support and grants, is increased by $5,106,587  for the expenditure of lottery
bond proceeds and costs of bond issuance related to the Oregon Main Street program.
SECTION 80.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of $394
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and in-
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 11
cluding federal funds received under cooperative agreements with or contracts  from the
Bureau of Reclamation of the United States Department of the Interior, the United States
Army Corps of Engineers, the United States Geological Survey,  the Bonneville Power Ad-
ministration and the National Fish and  Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in this section, collected or received  by the Water Resources
Department, for the payment of debt service.
SECTION 81.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill
5043), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and including federal
funds received under cooperative agreements with  or contracts from the Bureau of Recla-
mation of the United States Department of the  Interior, the United States Army Corps of
Engineers, the United States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration  and
the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds not
described in section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5043), collected
or received by the Water Resources Department,  for administrative services, is increased
by the following amounts for  paying the following costs from the Water Supply Development
Account established by ORS 541.656:
(1) Water Supply Development
grants and loans as described
in ORS 541.656 (2)(a) ................. $ 15,000,000
(2) Deschutes Basin Board of
Control piping project ............... $ 10,000,000
(3) Bond issuance costs .................. $ 521,689
SECTION 82.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled  House Bill
5043), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and including federal
funds received under cooperative agreements with or contracts  from the Bureau of Recla-
mation of the United States Department of the  Interior, the United States Army Corps of
Engineers, the  United States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration and
the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds not
described in section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5043), collected
or received by the Water Resources  Department, for administrative services, is increased
by the following amounts for paying  the following costs from the Water Resources Depart-
ment Water Supply Fund established by section 10, chapter 906, Oregon Laws 2009:
(1) City of Newport for planning,
environmental permitting and
design costs of replacing the
Big Creek Dams ........................ $ 4,000,000
(2) Wallowa Lake Irrigation
District for rehabilitation
of the Wallowa Lake Dam ........ $ 14,000,000
(3) Bond issuance costs .................. $ 327,563
SECTION 83.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled  House Bill
5035), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds  collected or received by the Department of State Lands, for South Slough
National Estuarine Research Reserve operations, is increased by $154,000 for the  expenditure
of grant funds awarded to the department from the National  Oceanic and Atmospheric Ad-
ministration.
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 12
SECTION 84. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5035),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019,  as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by
the Department of State Lands from  the Portland Harbor Cleanup Fund established by ORS
274.064, is increased by $6,000,000 for the purpose of fulfilling financial obligations under a
settlement agreement for funding remedial  design with the United States Environmental
Protection Agency.
SECTION 85.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill
5011), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer and Business
Services, for the Division of Financial Regulation, is  increased by $262,610 to restore a posi-
tion reduction in the Senior Health Insurance Benefit Assistance program.
SECTION 86. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill
5011), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds collected or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Ser-
vices, for the  Division of Financial Regulation, is increased by $780,000 to allow for the ex-
penditure of federal grant funding received by the  department from the Centers for Medicare
and Medicaid Services for planning and implementing insurance market reforms.
SECTION 87.
In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Forestry Department, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $200,000  for the purpose of purchasing an approximately
160-acre timber tract adjacent to the Willamette National  Forest Opal Creek Scenic Recre-
ation Area and Santiam State Forest, for addition to the Santiam State Forest.
SECTION 88. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Forestry Department, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,700,000, for the purpose of reducing the spread  of
Phytophthora ramorum in Oregon.
SECTION 89. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled  House Bill
5019), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and including federal
funds from  the United States Forest Service for fire protection and for research projects,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5019), collected or received by the State Forestry Department,
for fire protection, is increased  by $52,035 for bond issuance costs related to general obli-
gation bonds issued for the Toledo Facility Replacement.
SECTION 90. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State Forestry Department by section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2019
(Enrolled House Bill 5019), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for debt  service, is in-
creased by $121,559 for debt service related to bonds issued for the Toledo Facility  Replace-
ment.
SECTION 91. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill
5019), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and including federal
funds from the United States Forest Service for fire protection and for research  projects,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5019), collected or received by the State Forestry Department,
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 13
for debt service, is increased by $168,904 for debt  service related to bonds issued for the
Toledo Facility Replacement.
SECTION 92. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established  by section 5a, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill
5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
by the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission from lottery moneys allocated to the
Sports Lottery Account, is increased by $5,859,809.
SECTION 93. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$10,500,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and federal funds from the United States Department  of Housing and Urban Development for
contract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  this section,
collected or received by the Housing and Community Services Department, for the TANF
Housing Pilot Program created under section 1, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled
House Bill 2032).
SECTION 94.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund  appro-
priation made to the Housing and Community Services Department by  section 1, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate  Bill 5512), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, is re-
duced by  $935,504 to reflect the elimination of the Low-Income Rental Housing Fund pro-
gram, and to reduce General Fund support for ongoing operating expenditures.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section 2, chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5512), for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses for oper-
ations from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal
funds from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract
services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled  Senate Bill 5512), collected or received by the Housing and
Community Services Department, is  increased by $440,043 for ongoing support of research
and program analysis functions.
SECTION 95.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health  Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (En-
rolled Senate Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, for Health Systems, Health
Policy and Analytics, and Public Health,  is increased by $6,700,000 for inflationary expenses
for medical assistance programs.
SECTION 96. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate  Bill
5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), collected or received by the Oregon Health  Authority, for
Health Systems,  Health Policy and Analytics, and Public Health, is increased by $25,000,000
for inflationary expenses for medical assistance programs.
SECTION 97.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2019 (En-
rolled Senate Bill 5525), for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, for Health Systems, Health
Policy and Analytics, and Public Health, is decreased by $10,000,000  for savings unrelated,
directly or indirectly, to changes in caseloads for medical assistance programs.
SECTION 98. (1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5525),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Devel-
opment Fund to the Oregon Health Authority, for Health Systems and  Health Policy and
Analytics, is decreased by $2,500,000.
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 14
(2) Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the amount of $2,500,000 is es-
tablished for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of ex-
penses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Veterans’ Services Fund established under
ORS 406.140 to the Oregon Health Authority for veterans’ behavioral health services.
SECTION 99. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$216,435 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
tobacco tax receipts, recreational marijuana tax receipts,  provider taxes, Medicare receipts
and federal funds for  indirect cost recovery, Supplemental Security Income recoveries,
Women,  Infants  and Children Program food rebates, the Coordinated School Health Program,
the Edward Byrne Memorial State and Local  Law Enforcement Assistance Grant Program
and emergency preparedness and response services, but excluding  lottery funds and federal
funds not described in this section, collected or received by the  Oregon Health Authority, for
debt service.
SECTION 100. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for Health Systems,
Health Policy and Analytics, and Public Health, is increased by $1,000,000 for  providing com-
petitive grants to sobering facilities to support planning and startup costs.
SECTION 101. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for Health Systems,
Health Policy and Analytics, and Public Health, is increased by $200,000 for the Senior Farm
Direct Nutrition Program.
SECTION 102.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2019
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, for Health Systems,
Health Policy and Analytics, and Public Health,  is increased by $1,000,000 for the Women,
Infants and Children Farm Direct Nutrition Program.
SECTION 103. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019,  for self-sufficiency
and vocational rehabilitation services, is increased by $1,300,000  for the Oregon Hunger Re-
sponse Fund.
SECTION 104. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for self-sufficiency
and vocational  rehabilitation services, is increased by $1,500,000 for the Double Up Food
Bucks program.
SECTION 105. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5026), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, for central services
and state assessments and enterprise-wide  costs, is increased by $11,174,770 for the ONE
Integrated Eligibility and Medicaid Eligibility System project.
SECTION 106. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Human Services, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, out
of the General Fund, the  amount of $5,757,349 for capital debt service and related costs for
outstanding general obligation bonds sold pursuant to Article XI-Q of  the Oregon Constitu-
tion for the ONE Integrated Eligibility and Medicaid Eligibility System project.
SECTION 107. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$665,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 15
and Medicare receipts and including federal funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security
Supplemental Security Income recoveries  and the Child Care and Development Fund, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds not  described in this section, collected or received
by the Department of Human Services, for costs of  issuance of general obligation bonds sold
pursuant to Article  XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution for the ONE Integrated Eligibility and
Medicaid Eligibility System project.
SECTION 108. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill
5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys  or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts
and including federal funds for indirect  cost recovery, Social Security Supplemental Security
Income recoveries and the Child Care and  Development Fund, but excluding lottery funds
and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019  (Enrolled House
Bill 5026), collected or received by the Department of Human Services,  for central services
and state assessments and enterprise-wide  costs, is increased by $43,233,481 for the ONE
Integrated Eligibility and Medicaid Eligibility System project.
SECTION 109. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill
5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5026), collected or received by the Department  of Human Services,
for central services and state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is  increased by
$139,731,325 for the ONE Integrated Eligibility and Medicaid Eligibility System project.
SECTION 110.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2019
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, for Health Systems,
Health Policy and Analytics, and Public Health, is increased  by $671,490 for the ONE Inte-
grated Eligibility and Medicaid Eligibility System project.
SECTION 111. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5525),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), collected or received by the Oregon  Health
Authority, for Health Systems, Health Policy and Analytics, and Public Health, is increased
by $1,638,121 for the ONE Integrated Eligibility and Medicaid Eligibility System project.
SECTION 112.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5525),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax
receipts, recreational marijuana  tax receipts, provider taxes, Medicare receipts and federal
funds for indirect  cost recovery, Supplemental Security Income recoveries, Women, Infants
and Children Program food rebates, the Coordinated School Health  Program, the Edward
Byrne Memorial State and Local Law  Enforcement Assistance Grant Program and emer-
gency preparedness and response services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), collected
or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for shared administrative  services, is increased
by $11,216,676 for the ONE Integrated Eligibility and Medicaid Eligibility System project.
SECTION 113.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services by section 1 (3), chapter
___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5502), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2019,
for Oregon Public Broadcasting, is increased by $500,000.
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 16
SECTION 114. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services by  section 1 (4), chapter
___, Oregon Laws  2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5502), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019,
for the Oregon Historical Society, is increased by $1,250,000.
SECTION 115. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there are ap-
propriated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the  biennium beginning
July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) United Way for census outreach
and coordination activities........ $ 7,500,000
(2) Clatsop County for the
Clatsop County Jail ................... $ 2,000,000
(3) Innovation Law Lab for
immigration defense ................. $ 2,000,000
(4) Josephine County for rural
fire protection district
start-up costs after district
is created .................................. $ 1,500,000
(5) City of Salem for the
Gerry Frank/Salem Rotary
Amphitheater ............................ $ 1,000,000
(6) Umatilla-Morrow Head Start
for an Early Learning Center ... $ 1,000,000
(7) Umatilla County for surface
water pumping costs of
ground water rights holders in
critical ground water areas ...... $ 1,000,000
(8) Central Linn School District
for grade 6-8 Cobra Academy ... $ 700,000
(9) Siuslaw Regional Aquatic
Center for renovations of
the Mapleton pool ..................... $ 500,000
(10) Tucker Maxon School
for capital improvements .......... $ 500,000
(11) Association of Oregon
Counties for urban growth
boundary planning grants
to Eastern Oregon Counties ..... $ 500,000
(12) Oregon Thoroughbred Owners
and Breeders Association
for safety improvements at
race tracks that hold race
meets and education for
thoroughbred owners and
breeders .................................... $ 500,000
(13) Lutheran Community Services
Northwest for drug abuse
programs................................... $ 500,000
(14) Clackamas County for
Clackamas Women’s Services ... $ 485,000
(15) Douglas Timber Operators for
a Rogue River Sediment Study . $ 452,930
(16) Historical Portland Public
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 17
Market Foundation for
the James Beard Public Market $ 400,000
(17) City of Independence for a
Mid-Willamette Valley Trolley .. $ 300,000
(18) Liberty House of Salem for
childhood abuse assessment
and support services ................. $ 250,000
(19) Harney County School
District #1J to drill
a potable water well .................. $ 175,000
(20) Save the Salem Peace Mosaic
to protect the River of
Peace mosaic............................. $ 100,000
(21) Klamath County to acquire,
install and maintain stream
gauges in the Klamath Basin .... $ 30,000
(22) Special Olympics Oregon
for sports training and
athletic competition .................. $ 500,000
(23) Ecumenical Ministries of Oregon
for the Runaway Homeless
Youth Program ......................... $ 300,000
SECTION 116.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the following
amounts are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for
payment of expenses from lottery bond proceeds collected or received by  the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services for the following purposes:
(1) Eugene Family YMCA Facility .. $ 15,278,251
(2) City of Roseburg - Southern
Oregon Medical Workforce
Center ....................................... $ 10,243,438
(3) Oregon Coast Aquarium ........... $ 5,106,587
(4) YMCA of Columbia-Willamette -
Beaverton Hoop YMCA ............. $ 5,106,587
(5) Jefferson County - Health and
Wellness Center ........................ $ 4,158,104
(6) Parrott Creek Child & Family
Services - Building Renovation . $ 3,556,196
(7) Center for Hope &
Safety - Hope Plaza ................... $ 2,548,087
(8) Wallowa Valley Center
for Wellness .............................. $ 2,548,087
(9) Port of Cascade Locks -
Business Park Expansion .......... $ 2,445,625
(10) Multnomah County School
District #7 - Reynolds
High School Health Center ....... $ 2,377,028
(11) City of Gresham - Gradin
Community Sports Park ........... $ 2,042,875
(12) Curry Health District -
Brookings Emergency Room ..... $ 2,042,875
(13) Hacienda CDC - Las Adelitas
Housing Project ........................ $ 2,042,875
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 18
(14) Umatilla County Jail -
Expansion/Mental Health
Facility...................................... $ 1,643,532
(15) Port of Morrow - Early
Learning Center Expansion ...... $ 1,439,188
(16) Special Payments from proceeds
of previously issued bonds ........ $ 27,405,993
SECTION 117.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the following
amounts are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for
payment of expenses from proceeds of bonds issued under  Article XI-Q of the Oregon Con-
stitution, collected or received by the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the
following purposes:
(1) Oregon State Fair
capital improvements................ $ 5,430,000
(2) Oregon State Fair Horse Barn . $ 3,050,000
(3) Oregon State Fair Poultry Barn $ 2,045,000
SECTION 118.
(1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (12), chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5502),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal
funds received from charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in
section 2, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5502), collected or received
by the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, for Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services debt service, is increased by $4,527,721.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section 2 (6), chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5502), for
the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from
fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received
from charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section  2,
chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5502), collected or received by the
Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for Enterprise Asset Management, is in-
creased by $800,000 for the payment of bond issuance costs associated with bonds  issued
under Article XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 119.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Commission on Judicial Fitness and  Disability by section 1 (1), chapter 26,
Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5514), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for
administration, is increased by $16,000 for compensation plan adjustments and administrative
support.
SECTION 120.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5504),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Department of Cor-
rections, for community corrections, is increased by $4,585,442 for  the purpose of planning,
operating and maintaining county juvenile and adult corrections programs  and facilities and
drug and alcohol programs.
SECTION 121. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, to  be allocated to the Oregon Department of Cor-
rections or the Public Defense Services Commission, or both, for costs  relating to chapter
___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 2328).
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 19
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2020, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 122. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,146,094, to be allocated to the Secretary of State for  costs
relating to chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 861).
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2020, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 123. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5017), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for air quality,
is decreased by $110,247.
SECTION 124. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5017), for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, for water
quality, is decreased by $88,424.
SECTION 125. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5017), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for land qual-
ity, is increased by $198,671.
SECTION 126. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5017),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for debt ser-
vice, is increased by $834,752.
SECTION 127. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill
5017), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the proceeds of
bonds for the Orphan Site Account and  federal funds from congestion mitigation and air
quality grants, drinking water protection, beach bacteria  monitoring, laboratory accredi-
tation and woodstove grants and for smoke monitoring laboratory services, but excluding
lottery funds and federal funds not described  in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019
(Enrolled House Bill  5017), collected or received by the Department of Environmental Qual-
ity, for agency management, is increased by $5,065,000 for project costs and  for costs of is-
suing bonds for the Environmental Data Management System.
SECTION 128.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,500,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys, or other revenues, but excluding  lottery funds and
federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Health  Authority, for the Mental and Be-
havioral Health Pilot Program pursuant to section 2, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2019 (En-
rolled House Bill 2032).
SECTION 129. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$1,500,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by  the Oregon Health Author-
ity, for the Mental and Behavioral Health Pilot Program  pursuant to section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 2032).
SECTION 129a. Sections 128 and 129 of this 2019 Act become operative on the  effective
date of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 2032).
SECTION 130. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 20
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019,  for aging and people
with disabilities and intellectual/developmental disabilities programs,  is increased by
$2,235,831 for distribution to local Area Agencies on Aging.
SECTION 131. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill
5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys  or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts
and including federal funds for indirect  cost recovery, Social Security Supplemental Security
Income recoveries and the Child Care and  Development Fund, but excluding lottery funds
and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House
Bill 5026), collected or  received by the Department of Human Services, for aging and people
with disabilities and intellectual/developmental disabilities programs,  is increased by $251,600
for a one-time fund shift of nursing facility program expenditures.
SECTION 132. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill
5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5026), collected or received by the Department  of Human Services,
for aging and people with disabilities and  intellectual/developmental disabilities programs, is
increased by $167,188 for emergency services and quality metrics/council coordination.
SECTION 133.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019,  for aging and people
with disabilities and intellectual/developmental disabilities programs, is decreased by $268,514
for budget adjustments related to brokerage training and quality assurance work.
SECTION 134.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill
5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5026), collected or received by the Department of Human Services
for aging and people with disabilities and  intellectual/developmental disabilities programs, is
decreased by $267,674 for budget adjustments  related to brokerage training and quality as-
surance work.
NOTE:
 Section 135 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 136. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Land Conservation  and Development, for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,005,563  for the implementation
of the provisions of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House  Bill 2001), and chapter
___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 2003).
SECTION 137. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5512), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds other than those described in sections 2 and 6,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5512), collected or received by the Housing  and Community Ser-
vices Department, is decreased by $1,000,000 for the Housing Stabilization Program.
SECTION 138. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5512), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
from the  United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract ser-
vices, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5512), collected or received by  the Housing and
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 21
Community Services Department,  is increased by $5,000,000 for the Housing Stabilization
Program.
SECTION 139. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (11), chapter  ___,
Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House  Bill 5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for
Oregon State University Extension Service, is increased  by $375,000 for two organic agricul-
ture faculty positions.
SECTION 140. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission by section 1 (1), chapter __,
Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House  Bill 5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for
operations, is increased by $122,866 for a Chief Culture, Diversity and Inclusion position for
the commission.
SECTION 141.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 6 (1),  chapter __, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill
5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds and funds described in  sections 8 to 12, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5024), collected or received by the Higher  Education Coordinating
Commission, for operations, is increased by $27,030 for a  Chief Culture, Diversity and Inclu-
sion position for the commission.
SECTION 142. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 7 (1), chapter __, Oregon  Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill
5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section 10, chapter __, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5024), collected or received by the Higher  Education Coordinating
Commission, for operations, is increased by $95,466 for a  Chief Culture, Diversity and Inclu-
sion position for the commission.
SECTION 143.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$410,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department  from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
struction and Improvement Fund for the cost of  issuing general obligation bonds for the
Supreme Court Building Project.
SECTION 144. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by  section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (En-
rolled Senate Bill 5513), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, for operations, is increased
by $1,755,516 for staff to support implementation of chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2019 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 24), and chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 973).
SECTION 145. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (1),  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (En-
rolled Senate Bill 5513), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, for judicial compensation,
is increased by $456,000 to support two  circuit court judge positions established in chapter
___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 2377).
SECTION 146. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (2),  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (En-
rolled Senate Bill 5513), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, for operations, is increased
by $602,624 to support new circuit court judges.
SECTION 147. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 3 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5524), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic  Devel-
opment Fund to the Oregon Business Development Department, for business, innovation and
trade, is increased by $2,000,000 for the Strategic Reserve Fund.
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 22
SECTION 148. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (10), chapter  ___,
Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House  Bill 5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for
Agricultural Experiment Station and the branch extension stations  of Oregon State Univer-
sity, is increased by $125,000 for  a berry research position at the North Willamette Research
and Extension Center.
SECTION 149. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Military Department by  section 1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5031), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for  emergency
management, is increased by $300,000 for  a risk abatement study for the Critical Energy
Infrastructure Hub.
SECTION 150. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Secretary of State by section  1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (En-
rolled House Bill 5034), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for the Elections Division,
is increased by $336,696 for  costs associated with implementing campaign finance regulation
changes due to passage of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 2983).
SECTION 151. Section 150 of this 2019 Act becomes operative on the effective  date of
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 2983).
NOTE: Section 152 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 153. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5510),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and includ-
ing federal funds from the Pacific Coastal Salmon Recovery Fund, but excluding lottery funds
and federal funds not described in section  2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5510), collected or received by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife,  for the Fish
Division, is increased by $1,352,102 for the operation of the Leaburg Hatchery.
SECTION 154. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 4 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5510), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from federal funds other than those described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5510), collected or received by the State Department of Fish
and Wildlife, for the Fish Division, is decreased by $866,091.
SECTION 155.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2019
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, for Health Systems,
Health Policy  and Analytics, and Public Health, is increased by $6,000,000 for community
mental health programs.
SECTION 156. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$1,500,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
tobacco tax receipts, recreational marijuana  tax receipts, provider taxes, Medicare receipts
and federal funds for indirect cost recovery, Supplemental  Security Income recoveries,
Women,  Infants  and Children Program food rebates, the Coordinated School Health Program,
the Edward Byrne Memorial State and  Local Law Enforcement Assistance Grant Program
and emergency preparedness and response  services, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not described in this section, collected or received by the  Oregon Health Authority, for
maintaining, repairing, replacing, improving  and equipping facilities that serve individuals
pursuant to ORS 161.370.
SECTION 157. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Energy,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 23
the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000 for deposit into the Rooftop  Solar Incentive Fund
established by section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 2618).
SECTION 158. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the State Department of Energy from the Rooftop Solar Incentive
Fund established by section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 2618).
SECTION 159.
Sections 157 and 158 of this 2019 Act  become operative on the effective
date of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 2618).
SECTION 160. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appro-
priation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1  (10), chapter
___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5024), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, for
the Agricultural Experiment Station and the branch extension stations  of Oregon State
University, is increased by $2,270,000 for an integrated river basin water quality and  quantity
program.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General  Fund appropriation made to
the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (11), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled House Bill 5024), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, for Oregon State
University Extension  Service, is increased by $410,000 for an integrated river basin water
quality and quantity program.
SECTION 161.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the authorized appropriations
and expenditure limitations for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019,  for the following agen-
cies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
(1) ADMINISTRATION.
2019
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Advocacy Commissions
Office:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5001 1 -3,910
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
Chief Operating Office
General Fund SB 5502 1(1) -3,368
Other funds SB 5502 2(1) -54,288
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5502 1(6) -243,315
Chief Financial Office
Other funds SB 5502 2(2) -100,605
Office of the State Chief
Information Officer - Policy
Other funds SB 5502 2(3) -248,735
Chief Human Resource Office
Other funds SB 5502 2(4) -124,048
OSCIO - State Data Center
- Operations
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 24
Other funds SB 5502 2(5)(a) -288,959
Enterprise Asset Management
Other funds SB 5502 2(6) -393,145
Enterprise Goods and
Services
Other funds SB 5502 2(7) -1,162,748
Business Services
Other funds SB 5502 2(8) -603,766
Debt Service - ODAS
Other funds SB 5502 2(12) +448,163
ODAS Information Technology
Other funds SB 5502 2(14) +9,805
Debt Service and Related
Costs for Bonds Issued
Lottery funds SB 5502 3 -2,797,357
State Treasury:
Administrative Expenses
- Operations
Other funds HB 5042 1(1) -753,344
Administrative Expenses
- Oregon 529 Savings Network
Other funds HB 5042 1(2) -13,656
Administrative Expenses
- ORSB
Other funds HB 5042 1(3) -19,435
Oregon Racing Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5535 1 -74,492
Public Employees Retirement
System:
Central Administration
Division
Other funds HB 5032 1(1) -21,334
Financial and Administrative
Services Division
Other funds HB 5032 1(2) +187,025
Information Services
Division
Other funds HB 5032 1(3) -63,820
Operations Division
Other funds HB 5032 1(4) -141,042
Compliance, Audit and
Risk Division
Other funds HB 5032 1(5) -60,369
Secretary of State:
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund HB 5034 1(1) -26,571
Other funds HB 5034 2(1) -152,303
Elections Division
General Fund HB 5034 1(2) -111,845
Other funds HB 5034 2(2) -22
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 25
Federal funds HB 5034 3 -6,624
Archives Division
Other funds HB 5034 2(4) -254,370
Audits Division
Other funds HB 5034 2(3) -195,069
Corporation Division
Other funds HB 5034 2(5) -129,568
Oregon Liquor Control
Commission:
Administrative Expenses
Other funds SB 5519 1(1) -460,180
Marijuana Regulation
- Recreational
Other funds SB 5519 1(2) -105,949
Marijuana Regulation
- Medical
Other funds SB 5519 1(3) -33,076
Department of Revenue:
Administration
General Fund HB 5033 1(1) -1,167,647
Other funds HB 5033 2(1) -452,775
Property Tax Division
General Fund HB 5033 1(2) -127,017
Other funds HB 5033 2(2) -20,725
Personal Tax and
Compliance Division
General Fund HB 5033 1(3) -404,910
Other funds HB 5033 2(3) -5,839
Business Division
General Fund HB 5033 1(4) -164,655
Other funds HB 5033 2(4) -57,579
Information Technology
Services Division
General Fund HB 5033 1(6) -87,484
Other funds HB 5033 2(7) -9,796
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5033 1(8) -86,500
Other funds HB 5033 2(11) +90,000
Collections
Other funds HB 5033 2(5) -59,101
Marijuana Division
Other funds HB 5033 2(8) -11,134
Senior Property Tax
Deferral Program
Other funds HB 5033 2(9) -8,930
Employment Relations
Board:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5509 1 -24,878
Assessments of Agencies
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 26
Other funds SB 5509 3 -17,900
Office of the Governor:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5021 1 -212,024
Other funds HB 5021 4 -14,162
Regional Solutions
Lottery funds HB 5021 3 -30,060
Oregon Government Ethics
Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5020 1 -31,294
State Library:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5518 1 -2,658
Federal funds SB 5518 4 -4,478
Operating Expenses
- Non-Assessments
Other funds SB 5518 2 -454
Operating Expenses
- Assessments
Other funds SB 5518 3 -54,494
(2) CONSUMER AND BUSINESS SERVICES.
2019
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Board of Accountancy:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5501 1 -41,790
State Board of Tax
Practitioners:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5036 1 -12,149
Construction Contractors
Board:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5010 1 -223,798
Mental Health Regulatory
Agency
Oregon Board of Licensed
Professional Counselors
and Therapists:
Other funds HB 5012 1(1) -23,995
Oregon Board of Psychology:
Other funds HB 5012 2 -19,078
State Board of Chiropractic
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 27
Examiners:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5007 1 -40,563
State Board of Licensed
Social Workers:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5008 1 -23,401
Oregon Board of Dentistry:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5013 1 -55,978
Health-Related Licensing
Boards:
State Mortuary and Cemetery
Board
Other funds HB 5022 1 -29,389
Oregon Board of Naturopathic
Medicine
Other funds HB 5022 2 -13,354
Occupational Therapy
Licensing Board
Other funds HB 5022 3 -7,452
Board of Medical Imaging
Other funds HB 5022 4 -12,650
State Board of Examiners
for Speech-Language
Pathology and Audiology
Other funds HB 5022 5 -14,222
Oregon State Veterinary
Medical Examining Board
Other funds HB 5022 6 -16,864
Bureau of Labor and
Industries:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5516 1 -186,026
Other funds SB 5516 2 -110,096
Federal funds SB 5516 4 -19,597
Wage Security Fund
Administration
Other funds SB 5516 3(1) -18,436
Public Utility Commission:
Utility Program
Other funds SB 5534 1(1) -175,074
Residential Service
Protection Fund
Other funds SB 5534 1(2) -20,142
Administration
Other funds SB 5534 1(3) -133,804
Oregon Board of Maritime
Pilots
Other funds SB 5534 1(4) -8,711
Operating Expenses
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 28
Federal funds SB 5534 2 -6,195
Department of Consumer and
Business Services:
Workers’ Compensation
Board
Other funds HB 5011 1(1) -112,552
Workers’ Compensation
Division
Other funds HB 5011 1(2) -430,764
Oregon OSHA
Other funds HB 5011 1(3) -375,753
Federal funds HB 5011 5(1) -50,751
Central Services Division
Other funds HB 5011 1(4) -456,899
Federal funds HB 5011 5(3) -1,040
Division of Financial
Regulation
Other funds HB 5011 1(5) -421,714
Building Codes Division
Other funds HB 5011 1(6) -206,909
Federal funds HB 5011 5(4) -971
Health Insurance Exchange
- Marketplace Division
Other funds HB 5011 2(1) -57,618
Health Insurance Exchange
- Central Services Division
Other funds HB 5011 2(2) -5,165
COFA Premium Assistance
Program
Other funds HB 5011 3 -786
Senior Health Insurance
Benefit Assistance
Federal funds HB 5011 5(2) -2,764
Real Estate Agency:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5536 1 -87,703
Oregon State Board of
Nursing:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5523 1 -148,702
Oregon Medical Board:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5522 1 -105,576
State Board of Pharmacy:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5529 1 -93,745
(3) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
2019
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 29
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Business Development
Department:
Oregon Arts Commission
General Fund SB 5524 1(1) -5,946
Business, Innovation and
Trade
General Fund SB 5524 1(2) -1,658
Other funds SB 5524 2(1) -26,651
Lottery funds SB 5524 3(1) -47,888
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5524 1(3) -2,485,034
Infrastructure
Other funds SB 5524 2(2) -36,924
Lottery funds SB 5524 3(5) -6,228
Federal funds SB 5524 4(2) -5,259
Operations
Other funds SB 5524 2(3) -6,615
Lottery funds SB 5524 3(2) -32,653
Federal funds SB 5524 4(3) -819
Arts and Cultural Trust
Other funds SB 5524 2(4) -7,312
Lottery Bond Debt Service
Lottery funds SB 5524 3(4) -3,691,197
Housing and Community
Services Department:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5512 1 -5,741
Other funds SB 5512 2 -280,865
Federal funds SB 5512 4 -35,075
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5512 5 -1,589,080
Other funds SB 5512 5a +1,099
Lottery funds SB 5512 3 -79,455
Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
Services Provided by
the Department
General Fund SB 5538 1(1) -51,109
Lottery funds SB 5538 2(1) -38,334
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5538 1(4) -1,871,420
Veteran Loans, Oregon
Veterans’ Homes
Other funds SB 5538 3(1) -144,346
Employment Department:
Unemployment Insurance,
Shared Services and
Workforce Operations,
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 30
and Workforce and
Economic Research
Other funds SB 5508 1(1) -742,993
Office of Administrative
Hearings
Other funds SB 5508 1(2) -142,736
Modernization Initiative
Other funds SB 5508 1(4) -13,485
Operating Budget
Federal funds SB 5508 4 -665,899
(4) EDUCATION.
2019
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Teacher Standards and
Practices Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5537 1 -87,203
Department of Education:
Operations
General Fund HB 5015 1(1) -78,883
Other funds HB 5015 6(2) -312,705
Federal funds HB 5015 8(1) -323,883
Oregon School for the Deaf
General Fund HB 5015 1(2) -46,187
Other funds HB 5015 6(3) -7,158
Federal funds HB 5015 8(2) -532
Debt Service for Article
XI-P General Obligation
Bonds
General Fund HB 5015 4 -1,345,537
Article XI-P General
Obligation Bonds Debt
Service
Other funds HB 5015 6(4) +9,330
Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
HECC operations
General Fund HB 5024 1(1) -49,057
Debt Service - XI-G Bonds
Community Colleges
General Fund HB 5024
1(16)(a) -5,763,861
Debt Service - XI-G Bonds
Public Universities
General Fund HB 5024
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 31
1(16)(c) -6,587,074
Debt Service - XI-G Bonds
OHSU
General Fund HB 5024
1(16)(d) -48,310
Other funds HB 5024 6(6) +48,365
Debt Service - XI-Q Public
Universities
General Fund HB 5024
1(16)(e) -6,851,318
Lottery Debt Service - From
Administrative Services
Economic Development Fund
for Public Universities
Lottery funds HB 5024 2 -774,410
Lottery Debt Service
- From Administrative
Services Economic
Development Fund
for Community Colleges
Lottery funds HB 5024 3 -242,498
Operations
Other funds HB 5024 6(1) -20,782
Federal funds HB 5024 7(1) -30,036
Debt Service - Lottery,
XI-G and XI-Q Bonds
Public Universities
Other funds HB 5024 6(4) +4,876,782
Debt Service - Lottery,
XI-G Bonds Community
Colleges
Other funds HB 5024 6(5) +3,126,854
(5) HUMAN SERVICES.
2019
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Long Term Care Ombudsman:
General Program and Services
Provided to Care Facility
Residents
General Fund SB 5520 1(1) -38,161
Public Guardian and
Conservator Program
General Fund SB 5520 1(2) -22,300
Operating Expenses
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 32
Other funds SB 5520 2 -8,161
Commission for the Blind:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5503 1 -103,100
Other funds SB 5503 2 -7,232
Federal funds SB 5503 3 -115,724
Psychiatric Security Review
Board:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5531 1 -30,871
Department of Human
Services:
Central Services and
State Assessments and
Enterprise-Wide Costs
General Fund HB 5026 1(1) -3,414,064
Other funds HB 5026 2(1) -41,669
Federal funds HB 5026 3(1) -2,457,536
Self-Sufficiency and
Vocational Rehabilitation
Services
General Fund HB 5026 1(2) -999,602
Other funds HB 5026 2(2) -5,551
Federal funds HB 5026 3(2) -1,041,828
Child Welfare
General Fund HB 5026 1(3) -2,772,383
Other funds HB 5026 2(3) -21,685
Federal funds HB 5026 3(3) -2,313,873
Aging and People With
Disabilities and
Intellectual/Developmental
Disabilities Programs
General Fund HB 5026 1(4) -811,530
Other funds HB 5026 2(4) -31,250
Federal funds HB 5026 3(4) -1,175,271
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5026 1(5) -4,245,096
Shared Services
Other funds HB 5026 2(5) -634,550
Oregon Health Authority:
Health Systems, Health
Policy and Analytics, and
Public Health
General Fund SB 5525 1(1) -477,621
Other funds SB 5525 2(1) -464,672
Federal funds SB 5525 4(1) -737,699
Oregon State Hospital
General Fund SB 5525 1(2) -1,797,491
Central Services, State
Assessments and
Enterprise-Wide Costs
Other funds SB 5525 2(3) +486,993
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 33
Lottery funds SB 5525 3(2) -59
Federal funds SB 5525 4(3) +249,118
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5525 1(5) -216,292
Shared Administrative
Services
Other funds SB 5525 2(4) -527,248
Health Systems and Health
Policy and Analytics
Lottery funds SB 5525 3(1) -4,870
(6) JUDICIAL BRANCH.
2019
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Judicial Department:
Judicial Compensation
General Fund SB 5513 1(1) -303,123
Operations
General Fund SB 5513 1(2) -2,415,413
Other funds SB 5513 2(1) -29,678
Federal funds SB 5513 3 -1,408
Mandated Payments
General Fund SB 5513 1(3) -17,666
Other funds SB 5513 2(2) -200
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5513 1(5) -3,585,266
State Court Facilities and
Security Account
Other funds SB 5513 2(3) -4,308
State Court Technology Fund
Other funds SB 5513 2(4) -31,261
Public Defense Services
Commission:
Appellate Division
General Fund SB 5532 1(1) -84,196
Contract and Business
Services Division
General Fund SB 5532 1(3) -20,832
Other funds SB 5532 2(2) -3,183
(7) LEGISLATIVE BRANCH.
2019
Oregon Laws
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 34
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Legislative Administration
Committee:
General Program
General Fund SB 5517 1(1) -30,950
Other funds SB 5517 2(1) -553
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5517 1(2) -238,303
Other funds SB 5517 2(2) +38,500
Legislative Assembly:
Biennial General Fund
General Fund SB 5517 6 -194,383
80th Legislative Assembly
General Fund SB 5517 7(1) -20,542
81st Legislative Assembly
General Fund SB 5517 7(2) -20,994
Legislative Counsel
Committee:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5517 10 -70,545
Other funds SB 5517 11 -6,086
Legislative Fiscal
Officer:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5517 13(1) -30,828
Other funds SB 5517 13(2) -15,770
Legislative Revenue
Officer:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5517 15 -16,951
Commission on Indian
Services:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5517 16 -7,244
Legislative Policy and
Research Committee:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5517 14 -57,110
(8) NATURAL RESOURCES.
2019
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 35
State Marine Board:
Administration and
Education
Other funds SB 5521 1(1) -74,494
Federal funds SB 5521 2(1) -1,586
Marine Law Enforcement
Other funds SB 5521 1(2) -7,064
Facilities Construction
and Maintenance
Other funds SB 5521 1(3) -8,225
Federal funds SB 5521 2(3) -1,057
Aquatic Invasive Species
Other funds SB 5521 1(4) -2,643
State Department of Energy:
Operations
Other funds SB 5545 2 -423,278
Federal funds SB 5545 4 -7,330
Energy Efficiency and
Sustainable Technology
Debt Service
Lottery funds SB 5545 3 -5
State Department of
Geology and Mineral
Industries:
General Fund SB 5511 1 -25,615
Geologic Survey
Other funds SB 5511 2(1) -17,229
Mined Land Reclamation
Other funds SB 5511 2(2) -12,041
Federal funds SB 5511 3 -19,870
State Parks and Recreation
Department:
Director’s Office
Other funds SB 5527 1(1) -2,962
Lottery funds SB 5527 2(1) -2,906
Central Services
Other funds SB 5527 1(2) -613,631
Lottery funds SB 5527 2(2) -586,696
Parks Development
Other funds SB 5527 1(3) -1,666
Lottery funds SB 5527 2(3) -6,670
Direct Services
Other funds SB 5527 1(4) -268,356
Lottery funds SB 5527 2(4) -254,673
Federal funds SB 5527 4(2) -583
Community Support
and Grants
Other funds SB 5527 1(5) -7,032
Lottery funds SB 5527 2(5) -14,422
Federal funds SB 5527 4(3) -4,037
Debt Service
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 36
Lottery funds SB 5527 3 -76,557
Land Use Board of Appeals:
General Fund HB 5028 1 -21,627
Water Resources Department:
Administrative Services
General Fund HB 5043 1(1) -108,184
Other funds HB 5043 3(1) -4,099
Field Services
General Fund HB 5043 1(2) -136,226
Other funds HB 5043 3(2) -22,027
Federal funds HB 5043 4(2) -689
Water Rights and
Adjudications
General Fund HB 5043 1(3) -52,065
Other funds HB 5043 3(3) -51,430
Federal funds HB 5043 4(3) -526
Technical Services
General Fund HB 5043 1(4) -72,311
Other funds HB 5043 3(4) -34,578
Director’s Office
General Fund HB 5043 1(5) -66,927
Other funds HB 5043 3(5) -2,213
Debt Service
Lottery funds HB 5043 2 -926,818
Oregon Watershed
Enhancement Board:
Operating Expenses,
Activities and Projects
Lottery funds SB 5539 5 -22,280
Operations
Federal funds SB 5539 7(1) -6,493
Department of State Lands:
Common School Fund Programs
Other funds HB 5035 1(1) -454,595
Oregon Removal-Fill
Mitigation Fund
Other funds HB 5035 1(2) -529
South Slough National
Estuarine Research
Reserve Operations
Other funds HB 5035 1(3) -6,039
Federal funds HB 5035 3(1) -5,268
Debt Service
Lottery funds HB 5035 4 -589,920
State Department of
Agriculture:
Administrative and
Support Services
General Fund HB 5002 1(1) -24,908
Other funds HB 5002 2(1) -87,191
Food Safety
General Fund HB 5002 1(2) -127,991
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 37
Other funds HB 5002 2(2) -226,372
Federal funds HB 5002 4(2) -6,822
Natural Resources
General Fund HB 5002 1(3) -83,692
Other funds HB 5002 2(3) -154,773
Federal funds HB 5002 4(3) -25,383
Market Access
General Fund HB 5002 1(4) -47,094
Other funds HB 5002 2(4) -126,991
Federal funds HB 5002 4(4) -20,289
Parks and Natural
Resources Fund
Lottery funds HB 5002 3 -68,464
Department of Environmental
Quality:
Air Quality
General Fund HB 5017 1(1) -64,047
Other funds HB 5017 2(1) -273,788
Federal funds HB 5017 5(1) -34,987
Water Quality
General Fund HB 5017 1(2) -130,439
Other funds HB 5017 2(2) -162,556
Federal funds HB 5017 5(2) -47,973
Land Quality
General Fund HB 5017 1(3) -4,338
Other funds HB 5017 2(3) -265,766
Federal funds HB 5017 5(3) -30,644
Agency Management
Other funds HB 5017 2(4) -615,723
Parks and Natural
Resources Fund
Lottery funds HB 5017 3 -31,593
State Department of
Fish and Wildlife:
Fish Division
General Fund SB 5510 1(1) -69,161
Other funds SB 5510 2(1) -513,220
Lottery funds SB 5510 3(1) -15,425
Federal funds SB 5510 4(1) -253,532
Wildlife Division
General Fund SB 5510 1(2) -14,704
Other funds SB 5510 2(2) -256,006
Lottery funds SB 5510 3(2) -3,201
Federal funds SB 5510 4(2) -53,681
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund SB 5510 1(3) -1,052
Other funds SB 5510 2(3) -1,255,343
Federal funds SB 5510 4(3) -14,029
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5510 1(4) -324,470
Capital Improvement
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 38
Other funds SB 5510 2(4) -4,077
State Forestry Department:
Agency Administration
General Fund HB 5019 1(1) -8,485
Other funds HB 5019 2(1) -742,886
Federal funds HB 5019 4(1) -10,434
Fire Protection
General Fund HB 5019 1(2) -424,158
Other funds HB 5019 2(2) -301,163
Federal funds HB 5019 4(2) -44,571
Private Forests
General Fund HB 5019 1(3) -126,777
Other funds HB 5019 2(4) -50,028
Federal funds HB 5019 4(4) -22,542
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5019 1(4) -2,591,647
Other funds HB 5019 2(6) -17,720
State Forests
Other funds HB 5019 2(3) -264,017
Federal funds HB 5019 4(3) -79
Equipment Pool
Other funds HB 5019 2(7) -45,428
Facilities Maintenance
and Management
Other funds HB 5019 2(8) -96
Debt Service and Costs
Relating to Purchase of
Land in Gilchrist Forest
Lottery funds HB 5019 3 -61,999
Department of Land
Conservation and Development:
Planning Program
General Fund HB 5027 1(1) -210,807
Other funds HB 5027 2 -2,132
Federal funds HB 5027 3 -17,182
(9) PUBLIC SAFETY.
2019
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Board of Parole and
Post-Prison Supervision:
General Fund SB 5528 1 -101,621
Department of State Police:
Patrol Services, Criminal
Investigations, Gaming
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 39
Enforcement and Office of
the State Fire Marshal
General Fund SB 5530 1(1) -1,366,280
Other funds SB 5530 2(1) -476,466
Federal funds SB 5530 3(1) -4,408
Fish and Wildlife
Enforcement
General Fund SB 5530 1(2) -77,482
Other funds SB 5530 2(2) -188,654
Lottery funds SB 5530 4 -69,541
Federal funds SB 5530 3(2) -6,958
Forensic Services and
Chief Medical Examiner
General Fund SB 5530 1(3) -227,844
Other funds SB 5530 2(3) -5,569
Administrative Services,
Agency Support and Criminal
Justice Information Services
General Fund SB 5530 1(4) -450,415
Other funds SB 5530 2(4) -203,183
Federal funds SB 5530 3(4) -6,659
Forensic Services
Federal funds SB 5530 3(3) -5,578
Department of Corrections:
Operations and Health
Services
General Fund SB 5504 1(1) -2,686,551
Other funds SB 5504 2(1) -23,780
Central Administration
and Administrative Services
General Fund SB 5504 1(2) -5,253,887
Other funds SB 5504 2(2) -21,073
Offender Management
and Rehabilitation
General Fund SB 5504 1(3) -136,281
Community Corrections
General Fund SB 5504 1(4) -54,462
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5504 1(5) -505,768
Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission:
General Fund SB 5506 1 -42,049
Other funds SB 5506 3 -1,451
Federal funds SB 5506 4 -1,216
District Attorneys
and Deputies:
Department of Justice
for District Attorneys
General Fund HB 5014 1 -105,735
Department of Justice:
Office of the Attorney
General and Administration
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 40
General Fund SB 5515 1(1) -34,259
Other funds SB 5515 2(1) -401,353
Appellate Division
General Fund SB 5515 1(2) -14,156
Other funds SB 5515 2(2) -159,524
Criminal Justice Division
General Fund SB 5515 1(3) -74,853
Other funds SB 5515 2(4) -105,924
Federal funds SB 5515 3(2) -15,353
Crime Victim and Survivor
Services Division
General Fund SB 5515 1(4) -18,555
Other funds SB 5515 2(5) -61,876
Federal funds SB 5515 3(3) -177,718
Defense of Criminal
Convictions
General Fund SB 5515 1(5) -1,050,206
Division of Child Support
General Fund SB 5515 1(6) -175,760
Other funds SB 5515 2(8) -174,311
Federal funds SB 5515 3(4) -503,312
Child Support Enforcement
Automated System
Other funds SB 5515 2(9) -6,600
Debt Service and Related
Costs
General Fund SB 5515 1(8) +1,484,988
Civil Enforcement Division
Other funds SB 5515 2(3) -931,401
Federal funds SB 5515 3(1) -20,569
General Counsel Division
Other funds SB 5515 2(6) -439,308
Trial Division
Other funds SB 5515 2(7) -198,723
Oregon Military Department:
Administration
Other funds HB 5031 2(1) -28,641
Operations
General Fund HB 5031 1(2) -38,119
Other funds HB 5031 2(2) -30,007
Federal funds HB 5031 3(1) -509,493
Emergency Management
General Fund HB 5031 1(3) -82,486
Other funds HB 5031 2(3) -663,089
Federal funds HB 5031 3(2) -113,936
Community Support
Federal funds HB 5031 3(3) -67,848
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5031 1(5) -569,996
Other funds HB 5031 2(5) +33,000
Capital Improvements
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 41
Federal funds HB 5031 3(4) -328
Department of Public
Safety Standards and
Training:
Operations
Other funds SB 5533 2(1) -290,693
Federal funds SB 5533 3 -1,145
Oregon Youth Authority:
Operations
General Fund SB 5541 1(1) -1,803,255
Other funds SB 5541 2 -2,342
Federal funds SB 5541 3 -74,149
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5541 1(5) -3,922,881
(10) TRANSPORTATION.
2019
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Department of
Aviation:
Operations
Other funds HB 5004 1(1) -30,955
Federal funds HB 5004 2(1) -826
Aircraft Registration
Other funds HB 5004 1(2) -521
Pavement Maintenance
Other funds HB 5004 1(3) -608
Department of
Transportation:
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5039 1 -8,904
Other funds HB 5039 2(16) +8,904
Lottery funds HB 5039 4 -3,182,760
Maintenance and Emergency
Relief Program
Other funds HB 5039 2(2) -2,896,233
Preservation Program
Other funds HB 5039 2(3) -130,410
Bridge Program
Other funds HB 5039 2(4) -167,303
Operations Program
Other funds HB 5039 2(5) -168,997
Modernization Program
Other funds HB 5039 2(6) -234,561
Special Programs
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 42
Other funds HB 5039 2(7) -830,974
Local Government Program
Other funds HB 5039 2(8) -58,025
Driver and Motor Vehicle
Services
Other funds HB 5039 2(9) -685,116
Motor Carrier Transportation
Other funds HB 5039 2(10) -205,626
Transportation Program
Development
Other funds HB 5039 2(11) -242,522
Federal funds HB 5039 3(2) -570
Public Transit
Other funds HB 5039 2(12) -18,943
Federal funds HB 5039 3(3) -206
Rail
Other funds HB 5039 2(13) -37,373
Federal funds HB 5039 3(4) -54,841
Transportation Safety
Other funds HB 5039 2(14) -13,901
Federal funds HB 5039 3(5) -9,930
Central Services
Other funds HB 5039 2(15) -4,649,763
SECTION 162. This 2019 Act being necessary for  the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 30, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 30, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 43